Louisiana, session 2026, SB483.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1172, the introductory paragraph of 1173, the introductory
paragraph of 1174(A), 1175(B), (C), and (D) and 1177 are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 37:1173.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1172. Membership
A. The board shall consist of seventeen members appointed by the governor,
including two as follows:
(1) One licensed pharmacists pharmacist from each of the eight pharmacy
districts as provided in R.S. 37:1173. and one
(2) Eight members representing licensed healthcare professionals as
provided in R.S. 37:1173.1.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1147 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 483
(3) One representative of the consumers of Louisiana from the state at-large
who possess the qualifications specified in R.S. 37:1174.
B. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender,
ethnic, and geographical diversity.
B.C. Each appointment by the governor shall be subject to Senate
confirmation.
§1173. Pharmacy districts; district members
The eight pharmacy districts shall be comprised of the following parishes
with one member representing each district:
* * *
§1173.1. Licensed healthcare professionals; members
The eight licensed healthcare professional members on the board shall
be as follows:
(1) Three compounding pharmacists who, at the time of appointment and
throughout their service, are actively and primarily engaged in the practice of
compounding pharmacy in Louisiana, including but not limited to preparation
of sterile injectables, parenteral nutrition, or other pharmaceutical preparations
subject to United States Pharmacopeia Chapter 797 standards.
(2) One chain pharmacy pharmacist who, at the time of appointment and
throughout service, is actively employed by and practicing pharmacy in a retail
chain pharmacy organization that operates ten or more permitted pharmacy
locations in Louisiana.
(3) One hospital pharmacist who, at the time of appointment and
throughout service, is actively and primarily engaged in the practice of
pharmacy within a licensed hospital in Louisiana and has a minimum of five
years of experience in hospital pharmacy practice.
(4) One independent community pharmacy pharmacist who, at the time
of appointment and throughout service, is actively and primarily engaged in the
practice of pharmacy at an independent community pharmacy in Louisiana.
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1147 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 483
For purposes of this Paragraph, "independent community pharmacy" means
a Louisiana-permitted pharmacy that is not part of a chain organization
operating more than nine pharmacy locations within the state.
(5) One licensed pharmacist or licensed healthcare professional with
prescriptive authority who represents Districts 1, 2, 3, and 6.
(6) One licensed pharmacist or licensed healthcare professional with
prescriptive authority who represents Districts 4, 5, 7, and 8.
§1174. Qualifications
A. Each In addition to the requirements provided for in R.S. 37:1173.1,
each pharmacist member of the board shall at the time of appointment:
* * *
§1175. Appointment process; vacancies
* * *
B. When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the board representing one
of the eight districts provided for in R.S. 37:1173 for any reason, including
expiration of term, removal, resignation, death, disability, or disqualification, the
following nominating process shall be satisfied:
* * *
C. When the vacancy in question involves the consumer representative or a
licensed healthcare professional appointed pursuant to R.S. 37:1173.1, the
governor shall fill the vacancy at his pleasure within sixty days without following
the procedure set forth in Subsection B of this Section, provided the consumer
representative or licensed healthcare professional meets the requirements for such
member specified in this Section Part.
D. The For a vacancy filled pursuant to Subsection B of this Section the
secretary of the board shall be charged with the duty of forwarding to each licensed
pharmacist, by United States mail, to the last known address indicated in the board's
records, a nomination ballot. The ballot, or an accompanying communication, shall
indicate the date, time, and place, for the counting of ballots. At a gathering open to
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1147 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 483
the public, the ballots shall be counted openly by the secretary or by one or more
individuals designated by the president. The secretary shall certify to the governor
the names of the three nominees receiving the highest number of nominations. From
the names submitted to him in this manner, the governor may select and appoint one
eligible individual to fill the vacancy in question.
* * *
§1177. Terms
A. Except as provided in R.S. 37:1175, pharmacist members of the board and
licensed healthcare professionals who are not pharmacists appointed pursuant
to R.S. 37:1173.1 shall be appointed for a term of six years, beginning on July first
of the year in which the appointment is made.
B. The terms of the pharmacist members of the board and licensed
healthcare professionals who are not pharmacists appointed pursuant to R.S.
37:1173.1 shall be staggered, so that the terms of no more than six pharmacist
members shall expire in any year. Each member shall serve until a successor is
appointed and qualified.
C. The at-large consumer representative shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor.
D. A member may serve no more than two consecutive full terms.
Section 2.(A) Every member of the board serving in office on the effective date of
this Act shall be removed from office on June 30, 2026.
(B) No later than July 1, 2026, the governor shall appoint seventeen new members
to the board, which may include the reappointment of any existing member.
(C) Every appointment shall be in accordance with the board member qualifications
provided for of this Act.
(D) For the initial appointments pursuant to this Section, members appointed to
represent each of the eight pharmacy districts shall be appointed directly by the governor and
not in accordance with the nomination process provided for in R.S. 37:1175(B).
(E) Board members appointed pursuant to his Section shall be subject to Senate
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1147 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 483
confirmation in the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.